Tennessee, session 114, SB0199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-21-304, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(c) The commissioner may take reasonable measures to publicize the availability
of the option described in this part to potential participants.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-307, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (d) and redesignating existing subsection (d) accordingly:
(d) The department may take reasonable measures to publicize the availability
of the option described in this section to potential participants.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0199
000125
- 1 -